Louisiana, session 2026, HB494.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1104(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1104. Duties and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations; permits
* * *
F. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the secretary shall
not permit any activity related to carbon dioxide sequestration within St. Helena
Parish.